Maine, session 132, LD22.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §3251, as amended by PL 2001, c. 454, §11, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
§3251. Education in the unorganized territory; eligibility to enroll
Education in elementary schools and secondary schools in the unorganized territory
must be provided in alignment with the system of learning results as established in section
6209 under the direction of the commissioner and must meet the general standards for
elementary and secondary education and special education established pursuant to this
Title. The following provisions apply to enrollment in elementary schools and secondary
schools in the unorganized territory.
1. Eligibility to enroll; school year. A person meeting the minimum age requirements
of subsection 2 or section 7001, subsection 1‑B, paragraph B and who has not reached 20
years of age before the start of the school year may enroll as a full-time student or, with the
permission of the commissioner, as a part-time student in the elementary school or
secondary school where the student is assigned in the unorganized territory. The school
year, for the purpose of this subsection, is defined as starting on July 1st and ending on the
following June 30th.
2. Minimum ages. The following are minimum ages necessary for student enrollment
in elementary schools in the unorganized territory.
A. A person who will be at least 5 years of age on October 15th of the school year may
enroll in school.
B. A person who will be at least 4 years of age on October 15th of the school year may
enroll in a public preschool program prior to kindergarten if it is offered.
3. Exceptions. The following are exceptions to this section.
A. A war veteran who has not completed high school before the veteran's 18th birthday
may enroll in the elementary schools and secondary schools in the unorganized
Page 1 - 132LR0129(03)

territory until the veteran graduates or until the end of the school year in which the
veteran reaches 25 years of age.
B. A person who has enrolled in a public kindergarten or grade one in another state
may enroll in kindergarten or grade one, as the case may be, in an elementary school
in the unorganized territory.
C. A person who was enrolled in a public kindergarten in this State under paragraph
B may enroll in grade one upon satisfactory completion of kindergarten.
D. A person who was enrolled in a public kindergarten in another state and was
promoted to grade one may enroll in grade one in an elementary school in the
unorganized territory.
E. The eligibility for a child with a disability is governed by chapter 303.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §3252, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2007, c. 541, Pt. C, §1, is
further amended to read:
5. Transportation and board. The costs of transportation or board for students under
this section may be paid in full or in part by the commissioner except that the commissioner
may not provide or reimburse parents for providing transportation of students over roads
that have not been accepted by the county as public roads or do not meet Department of
Transportation standards. Beginning with fiscal year 2009-10, the commissioner may not
reimburse parents for the transportation of a student.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §3271, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2011, c. 614, §8, is further
amended to read:
3. Exceptions. Attendance at school or an alternative education program is not
required of:
A. A person who has graduated from high school before the person's 17th birthday;
B. A person who is has attained at least 15 years old of age, has completed the 9th
grade and has permission to leave school to participate in a suitable program of training
or combined work and study from a parent and the commissioner; and
C. A person who has been adjudged a truant and has been excused from attendance
pursuant to procedures established by the commissioner.; or
D. A person who has matriculated and is attending an accredited postsecondary
degree‑granting institution as a full‑time student. An exception to attendance in public
school under this paragraph must be approved by the commissioner.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §3272, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2007, c. 304, §2, is
further amended to read:
B. An appointment with a health professional that must be made during the regular
school day and the absence has prior approval;
Page 2 - 132LR0129(03)